District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.08

Immunity from liability.

No employee, subcontractor, designee, or representative of the Ombudsman Program shall be held liable for the good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter, except that no immunity shall extend to criminal acts, or acts that violate District or federal law.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 9, 52 DCR 1981